Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-3512
Good character, defined.

Good character means such character as will enable a person to discharge the fiduciary duties of a professional geologist to a client of such professional geologist and to the public for the protection of the public health, safety, and welfare.

Laws 1998, LB 1161, § 60;

Laws 2025, LB38, § 10.